District of Columbia statutes.
50-1604

District of Columbia Bicycle Advisory Council.

(a)

There is established a District of Columbia Bicycle Advisory Council (the “Council”).

(b)

(1)

The Council shall be composed of 17 members appointed as follows:

(A)

The bicycle coordinator of the Office of Bicycle Transportation and Safety of the District Department of Transportation, as established in § 50-1603;

(B)

The Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department or his or her designee;

(C)

The Director of the Office of Planning or his or her designee;

(D)

The Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation or his or her designee; and

(E)

Thirteen community representatives, with each member of the Council of the District of Columbia appointing one representative.

(2)

(A)

Each community representative shall be a resident of the District with a demonstrated interest in bicycling.

(B)

A chairperson shall be elected from among the 13 community representatives and shall serve for a term of 2 years.

(c)

(1)

The community members shall be appointed for a term of 3 years, with initial staggered appointments of 4 members appointed for 1 year, 5 members appointed for 2 years, and 4 members appointed for 3 years. The members to serve the 1-year term, the members to serve the 2-year term, and the members to serve the 3-year term shall be determined by lot at the 1st meeting of the Council.

(2)

Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment to the position that became vacant. Community members who are appointed to fill vacancies that occur before the expiration of a community member’s full term shall serve only the unexpired portion of the community member’s term.

(c-1)

The District Department of Transportation shall provide the Bicycle Advisory Council with an annual operating budget, which shall include funds to maintain a website, where the Bicycle Advisory Council shall provide a public listing of members, meeting notices, and meeting minutes.

(d)

The purpose of the Council shall be to serve as the advisory body to the Mayor, Council of the District of Columbia, and District agencies on matters pertaining to bicycling in the District and to make recommendations to the bicycle coordinator on the budget and focus of the Comprehensive Bicycle Transportation and Safety Program.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-179, § 5, 32 DCR 764
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 28, 48 DCR 7612
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 26(f), 51 DCR 881
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-184, § 2(b), 55 DCR 6101
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 238(b), 56 DCR 1117
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 6062, 57 DCR 181
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 6052, 60 DCR 12472
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6072, 62 DCR 10905
1981 Ed., § 40-1404.
D.C. Law 14-42, in subsec. (d), inserted “, Council of the District of Columbia” before “and District”.
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (d), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 17-184 rewrote subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 17-353 validated previously made technical corrections in subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 18-111 added subsec. (c-1).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote (b)(2)(B).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 designated the existing text of (c) as (c)(1); and added (c)(2).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 28 of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6062 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of § 6062 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6052 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6052 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6072 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Section 6051 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle F of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “Bicycle Advisory Council Amendment Act of 2013”.
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the “Department of Recreation” renamed the “Department of Recreation and Parks” shall be known as the “Department of Parks and Recreation.”
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.